Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.060

Duties of department—Promotion of health care cost-effectiveness.

It is the intent of the legislature to promote appropriate use of health care resources to maximize access to adequate health care services. The legislature understands that the rapidly increasing costs of health care are limiting access to care. To promote health care cost-effectiveness, the department shall:

(1) Implement the certificate of need program;

(2) Monitor and evaluate health care costs;

(3) Evaluate health services and the utilization of services for outcome and effectiveness; and

(4) Recommend strategies to encourage adequate and cost-effective services and discourage ineffective services.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 108.]